Utah statutes.
26-45-106.   Enforcement.
(1)  Whenever the attorney general has reason to believe that any person is
using or is about to use any method, act, or practice in violation of the
provisions of this chapter, and that proceedings would be in the public
interest, the attorney general may bring an action against the person to
restrain or enjoin the use of such method, act, or practice.
(2)  In addition to restraining or enjoining the use of a method, act, or
practice, the court may, after June 30, 2003, require the payment of:
(a)  a civil fine of not more than $25,000 for each separate intentional
violation; and
(b)  reasonable costs of investigation and litigation, including reasonable
attorneys' fees.
